Utah statutes.
7-1-510.   Examination of institutions -- Adoption of rules -- Requiring
actions by institutions.
If the commissioner finds that it is in the public interest and necessary to
protect the depositors and other customers of a financial institution, he may:
(1)  examine the books and records of any financial institution holding
company and require the company to furnish whatever reports that he considers
appropriate to properly supervise the company's financial institution
subsidiaries;
(2)  adopt and issue rules consistent with the purposes and provisions of this
title as they pertain to financial institution holding companies; and
(3)  require a financial institution holding company to take any action he
finds reasonable and necessary to protect the interests of depositors, other
customers, and creditors of any subsidiary financial institution, to maintain
its solvency or to prevent its failure.
